Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.100

Biennial report.

The state board of health shall report to the governor by July 1st of each even-numbered year including therein suggestions for public health priorities for the following biennium and such legislative action as it deems necessary.

[ 2009 c 518 s 23; 1977 c 75 s 44; 1965 c 8 s 43.20.100. Prior: 1891 c 98 s 11; RRS s 6007.]